ja: レギュレータポートスレッド規格: AN (JIC) フレア; BSPP/BSPT; バンジョー; バーブ; メトリック（ISO）; NPT; OEM クイックディスコネクト; クイックコネクト; その他
zh-TW: 調節器連接埠螺紋標準: AN (JIC) 擴口螺紋; BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; 倒刺; 公制 (ISO); NPT; 原廠 (OEM) 快速斷開接頭; 快速連接; 其他
el: Πρότυπο σπειρώματος θύρας ρυθμιστή: AN (JIC) flare; BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Barb; Μετρικό (ISO); NPT; Ταχείας αποσύνδεσης OEM; Ταχείας σύνδεσης; Άλλο
zh-CN: 调压器接口螺纹标准: AN (JIC) 扩口; BSPP/BSPT; 班卓; 宝塔接头; 公制 (ISO); NPT; OEM 快速断开; 快速连接; 其他
nl: Regelaar poortschroefdraadnorm: AN (JIC)-flare; BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Weerhaak; Metrisch (ISO); NPT; OEM-snelsluiting; Snelkoppeling; Overig
tr: Regülatör port diş standardı: AN (JIC) havşa; BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Kurt ağzı; Metrik (ISO); NPT; OEM hızlı ayırma; Hızlı bağlantı; Diğer
hr-HR: Standardni navoj priključka regulatora: AN (JIC) flare; BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Nastavak za crijevo (barb); Metrički (ISO); NPT; Brzo odspajanje OEM; Brzi priključak; Ostalo
ko: 레귤레이터 포트 나사산 표준: AN(JIC) 플레어; BSPP/BSPT; 반조; 바브; 미터법(ISO); NPT; OEM 퀵 디스커넥트; 퀵 커넥트; 기타
sv: Regulatorport – gängstandard: AN-flare (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Slangnippel; Metrisk (ISO); NPT; OEM-snabbkoppling; Snabbkoppling; Annat
pt-PT: Norma de rosca das portas do regulador: Flange AN (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Espigão; Métrica (ISO); NPT; Desconexão rápida OEM; Ligação rápida; Outro
sk-SK: Norma závitu portu regulátora: AN (JIC) rozširujúci sa; BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Hadicový tŕň; Metrický (ISO); NPT; Rýchlospojka OEM; Rýchlospojka; Iné
es: Estándar de rosca del puerto del regulador: Abocardado AN (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Espiga; Métrica (ISO); NPT; Desconexión rápida OEM; Conexión rápida; Otro
it: Thread standard della porta del regolatore: Svasatura AN (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Portagomma; Metrica (ISO); NPT; Sgancio rapido OEM; Attacco rapido; Altro
de: Gewindestandard des Regleranschlusses: AN- (JIC-) Bördelung; BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Schlauchtülle; Metrisch (ISO); NPT; OEM-Schnellkupplung; Schnellkupplung; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Regulador porta rosca padrão: Flange AN (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Espigão; Métrica (ISO); NPT; Desconexão rápida OEM; Conexão rápida; Outro
en: Regulator port thread standard: AN (JIC) flare; BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Barb; Metric (ISO); NPT; OEM quick-disconnect; Quick-connect; Other
cs: Standard závitu portu regulátoru: AN (JIC) s převlečnou maticí; BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Nástrčný trn; Metrický (ISO); NPT; Rychlospojka OEM; Rychlospojka; Jiné
sl-SI: Standard navoja odprtine regulatorja: Konusni navoj AN (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Nastavek za cev; Metrični (ISO); NPT; Hitra spojka OEM; Hitra spojka; Drugo
da: Regulatorports gevindstandard: AN (JIC)-flare; BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Slangestuds; Metrisk (ISO); NPT; OEM-lynkobling; Lynkobling; Andet
lt-LT: Reguliatoriaus jungties sriegio standartas: AN (JIC) kūginis; BSPP / BSPT; Banjo; Žarnos antgalis (Barb); Metrinis (ISO); NPT; OEM greito atjungimo; Greito prijungimo; Kitas
nb: Gjengestandard for regulatorport: AN (JIC) krage; BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Slangestuss; Metrisk (ISO); NPT; OEM-hurtigkobling; Hurtigkobling; Annet
th: พอร์ตเรกูเลเตอร์มาตรฐาน: บานท่อแบบ AN (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; หางปลาไหล; เมตริก (ISO); NPT; แบบปลดเร็ว OEM; แบบสวมเร็ว; อื่นๆ
vi: Tiêu chuẩn ren cổng điều chỉnh: Đầu loe AN (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Ngạnh; Hệ mét (ISO); NPT; Tháo nhanh OEM; Kết nối nhanh; Khác
ro-RO: Standardul filetului portului regulatorului: Conic AN (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Ștuț; Metric (ISO); NPT; Deconectare rapidă OEM; Conectare rapidă; Altele
fr: Norme de filetage des orifices du régulateur: Évasement AN (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Cannelé; Métrique (ISO); NPT; Raccord rapide OEM; Raccord rapide; Autre
hu: Nyomásszabályozó csatlakozómenet-szabványa: AN (JIC) peremes; BSPP/BSPT; Áteresztő (banjo); Bordás; Metrikus (ISO); NPT; OEM gyorscsatlakozó; Gyorscsatlakozó; Egyéb
fi: Paineensäätimen liitännän kierteen standardi: AN-laippa (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Väkänen; Metrinen (ISO); NPT; OEM-pikaliitin; Pikaliitin; Muu
ru: Стандарт резьбы портов регулятора: Развальцовка AN (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Банджо; Штуцер; Метрическая (ISO); NPT; Быстросъемное соединение OEM; Быстроразъемное соединение; Другое
pl: Standardowy gwint przyłącza regulatora: Złącze kielichowe AN (JIC); BSPP/BSPT; Banjo; Króciec choinkowy; Metryczny (ISO); NPT; Szybkozłącze OEM; Szybkozłącze; Inne
bg-BG: Стандарт на резбата на порта на регулатора: AN (JIC) резба; BSPP/BSPT; Банджо; Щуцер; Метрична (ISO); NPT; OEM бърза връзка; Бърза връзка; Други